Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 HF 2226 (2) 91 mb/jh/md H.F. 2226 Section 1. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 39A. a. Not later than December 31, 2026, 3 adopt a policy requiring that, beginning with the fall 2027 4 semester, that not less than seventy percent of the students 5 who are accepted into the bachelor of science in nursing 6 program at the college of nursing at the state university of 7 Iowa each year be residents of Iowa. 8 b. Adopt a policy that gives priority for admission to 9 residents of Iowa who apply to the bachelor of science in 10 nursing program at the state university of Iowa. 11 c. Adopt a policy requiring an application for admission 12 to the bachelor of science in nursing program at the state 13 university of Iowa to include an applicant attestation that 14 includes all of the following: 15 (1) I was born in Iowa or graduated from an Iowa high 16 school. 17 (2) I was not born in Iowa or did not graduate from an Iowa 18 high school; however, I am interested in working in Iowa after 19 graduation. 20 (3) I was not born in Iowa or did not graduate from an 21 Iowa high school; however, I am interested in enrolling in the 22 bachelor of science in nursing program at the state university 23 of Iowa. 24 d. (1) Require the state university of Iowa to submit an 25 annual report to the general assembly that contains, for the 26 immediately preceding calendar year, all of the following: 27 (a) The number of applicants who are residents of Iowa who 28 were accepted to the bachelor of science in nursing program. 29 (b) The number of applicants who are residents of Iowa 30 who were not accepted to the bachelor of science in nursing 31 program, and a brief statement related to why each applicant 32 was denied. 33 (2) Personal information regarding an applicant in an 34 annual report submitted pursuant to this paragraph shall 35 -1- HF 2226 (2) 91 mb/jh/md 1/ 2 H.F. 2226 be kept confidential as required under the federal Family 1 Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. Â§1252g, and in 2 the same manner as personal information in student records 3 maintained, created, collected, or assembled by or for a school 4 corporation or education institution in accordance with section 5 22.7, subsection 1. 6 e. For purposes of this subsection: 7 (1) âBachelor of science in nursing programâ means the 8 undergraduate bachelor of science in nursing degree program 9 offered by the college of nursing at the state university of 10 Iowa. 11 (2) âResident of Iowaâ means an individual who graduated 12 from an Iowa high school. 13 -2- HF 2226 (2) 91 mb/jh/md 2/ 2